Idaho, session 2026, H0592.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 13, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-1397, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-1397. PATIENT IMMIGRATION STATUS DATA COLLECTION. (1) Every hospi-
tal that accepts medicaid shall include a provision on its patient admission
or registration forms for the patient or the patient's representative to
state or indicate the immigration status of the patient, including whether
the patient is a United States citizen or lawfully present in the United
States or is not lawfully present in the United States. The inquiry shall
be followed by a statement that the response will not affect patient care
or result in a report of the patient's immigration status to immigration
authorities.
(2) Every hospital shall submit a quarterly report to the Idaho depart-
ment of health and welfare within thirty (30) days after the end of each cal-
endar quarter. Such report shall include the number of hospital admissions
or emergency department visits within the previous quarter that were made by
a patient self-reporting as a citizen of the United States, as being lawfully
present in the United States, or as being not lawfully present in the United
States.
(3) By March 1 of each year, the department of health and welfare shall
submit a report to the governor, the president pro tempore of the senate, and
the speaker of the house of representatives. The report shall include the
total number of hospital admissions and emergency department visits for the
previous calendar year broken down by the three (3) categories described in
subsection (2) of this section. The report shall also describe information
relating to the costs of uncompensated care for aliens who are not lawfully
present in the United States, the impact of uncompensated care on the cost
or ability of hospitals to provide services to the public, hospital funding
needs, and other related information.
(4) The department of health and welfare may promulgate rules, subject
to legislative approval, relating to the format of and information to be con-
tained in quarterly reports and the acceptable formats for hospitals to use
in requesting information regarding a patient's immigration status on hos-
pital admission or registration forms. The rules may not require the disclo-


sure of patient names or any other personal identifying information to the
department of health and welfare.
(5) As used in this section, "immigration status" means a person's le-
gal status in the United States as governed by the immigration and national-
ity act. "Immigration status" includes the following groups:
(a) Individuals with citizenship who are born within the territorial
limits of the United States or who have successfully completed the natu-
ralization process after living as a permanent resident for a specified
period;
(b) Permanent residents, including lawful permanent residents who
are granted authorization to live and work in the United States in-
definitely and conditional permanent residents who have gained status
through marriage or certain investor programs, which status is contin-
gent on fulfilling specific conditions;
(c) Nonimmigrants who are authorized to enter the United States only
temporarily for certain purposes, such as students or temporary work-
ers;
(d) Refugees and asylees who have been admitted to the United States
as a refugee, have been granted asylum, or can provide documentary evi-
dence that they have applied for asylum; and
(e) Undocumented migrants or illegal aliens who have overstayed their
visa or entered the United States without authorization regardless of
any temporary status they may have been granted by the department of
homeland security allowing them to be present in the United States.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.